Utah statutes.
78B-3-206.   Service of process.

(1)  Service of process on any party outside the state may be made pursuant to the applicable provisions of Rule 4 of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure.

(2)  Service of summons and of a copy of the complaint, if any, may also be made upon any person located without this state by any individual over 21 years of age, not a party to the action, with the same force and effect as though the summons had been personally served within this state.  No order of court is required.  An affidavit of the server shall be filed with the court stating the time, manner and place of service.  The court may consider the affidavit, or any other competent proofs, in determining whether proper service has been made.

(3)  Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to limit or affect the right to serve process in any other manner provided by law.

